Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 30
FIRE GUARDS

Section

40-30-101. Fire guard by plowing.

Every railroad corporation operating its lines of road or any part thereof within this state, between the fifteenth day of July and the first day of November of each and every year, upon each side of its line of road, shall plow as a fire guard a continuous strip of not less than six feet in width, which said strip of land shall run parallel with said line of railroad and be plowed in such a good and workmanlike manner as to effectually destroy and cover up the vegetation thereon and be sufficient to prevent the spread of fire. In addition thereto all such railroad corporations shall cause to be burned, between said dates, all the grass and vegetation lying between the said plowed strips and the track of said road, and the outer line of said strip of plowed land shall be upon the outer line of such corporation's right-of-way or, if upon land owned by said corporation, one hundred feet on either side from the center of the road. Such fire guard to be so plowed need not be constructed within the limits of any town or city, nor along the line of a railroad running through the mountains, nor in other lands where plowing would be impracticable, but the provisions respecting the burning of a strip on each side shall be duly conformed with whenever any vegetation is found along such line of road. The boards of county commissioners of the various counties of the state shall prescribe for their respective counties where the plowing of such fire guard and burning shall be done.

Source:

L. 1874:

p. 224, § 1.

G.L.

§ 2235.

L. 1879:

p. 73, § 1.

L. 1883:

p. 198, § 1.

G.S.

§ 2796.

R.S. 08:

§ 5509.

C.L.

§ 2889.

CSA:

C. 139, § 75.

CRS 53:

§ 116-11-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-11-1.

40-30-102. Penalty for noncompliance.

Any railroad company failing to comply with the provisions of section 40-30-101 shall be liable to pay a penalty of two hundred dollars for each and every mile or fractional part thereof of such strip of land it neglects to plow on either side of the line of its road in this state, in each and every year, the same to be collected in an action of debt in any court of competent jurisdiction in the name of the people of the state of Colorado, and when collected it shall be paid into the school fund of the county wherein the cause of action accrued. The action shall be brought within the time period prescribed in section 13-80-101, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 1874:

p. 225, § 2.

G.L.

§ 2236.

G.S.

§ 2797.

R.S. 08:

§ 5510.

C.L.

§ 2890.

CSA:

C. 139, § 76.

CRS 53:

§ 116-11-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-11-2.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 705, § 18 effective July 1.

40-30-103. Liability of railroad company.

Every railroad company operating its line of road, or any part thereof, within this state shall be liable for all damages by fires that are set out or caused by operating any such line of road, or any part thereof, in this state, whether negligently or otherwise. Such damages may be recovered by the party damaged by a proper action in any court of competent jurisdiction; but said action shall be brought by the party injured within two years next ensuing after it accrues. The liability imposed in this section shall inure solely in favor of the owner or mortgagee of the property so damaged or destroyed by fire, and the same shall not pass by assignment or subrogation to any insurance company that has written a policy thereon.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 404, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 5512.

C.L.

§ 2892.

CSA:

C. 139, § 78.

CRS 53:

§ 116-11-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-11-3.